Utah statutes.
58-54-8.   Supervision and prescription required.

The practice of radiologic technology by a radiology technologist licensed under this chapter shall be under the general supervision of a radiologist or radiology practitioner and may be performed only upon the order of a radiologist or radiology practitioner acting within the scope of his license and experience within the scope of practice of a radiology practitioner.

